Tennessee statutes. Title 23 Attorneys-at-law
Chapter 2

Rights and Duties

23-2-101. Counsel assigned to paupers.

At the return term of the process, the court may appoint counsel for the plaintiff in actions prosecuted in the manner prescribed for paupers, and also for the defendant, if the defendant makes an oath that, owing to the defendant's poverty, the defendant cannot employ counsel.

Code 1858, § 3980 (deriv. Acts 1821, ch. 22, § 3; 1857-1858, ch. 58); Shan., § 5792; mod. Code 1932, § 9983; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-201.

Cross-References. Attorney not obligated to act as sheriff, §8-8-101.

District attorneys prohibited from practicing, §8-7-104.

Exemption of attorney from jury service, §22-1-103.

Pauper's oath, §20-12-127.

Law Reviews.

Contempt — Refusal to Accept Appointment as Attorney, 18 Tenn. L. Rev. 772.

Comparative Legislation. Rights and duties:

Ala. Code §15-12-6 et seq.; §15-12-22 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-12-108.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §5-6-4; §15-11-21.

Ky. § 31.010 et seq.; § 453-190.

Miss. Code Ann. §99-15-15 et seq.; §41-21-79 et seq.; §21-23-7.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 514.040.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1-110.

Va. Code § 14.1-183.

Cited: United States ex rel. Randolph v. Ross, 298 F. 64, 1924 U.S. App. LEXIS 2608, 33 A.L.R. 728 (6th Cir. Tenn. 1924).

23-2-102. Lien on right of action.

Attorneys and solicitors of record who begin a suit shall have a lien upon the plaintiff's or complainant's right of action from the date of the filing of the suit.

Acts 1899, ch. 243, § 1; Shan., § 3592a1; mod. Code 1932, § 8035; Acts 1969, ch. 310, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-202.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, §§ 9-18.

Law Reviews.

Attorney's Fees: Where Shall the Ultimate Burden Lie?, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 1216.

Attorney vs. Client: Lien Rights and Remedies in Tennessee (Margret H. Tucker), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 435.

Cited: Martin v. McMinnville, 51 Tenn. App. 503, 369 S.W.2d 902, 1962 Tenn. App. LEXIS 123 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1962); In re Robby's Pancake House, Inc., 24 B.R. 989, 1982 Bankr. LEXIS 3000 (Bankr. E.D. Tenn. 1982); Knobler v. Knobler, 697 S.W.2d 583, 1985 Tenn. App. LEXIS 2715 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1985); In re Estate of Hale, 704 S.W.2d 725, 1985 Tenn. App. LEXIS 3331 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1985).

23-2-103. Lien on action begun before employment.

Any attorney or solicitor who is employed to prosecute a suit that has already been brought in any court of record shall have a lien upon the plaintiff's right of action from the date of the attorney's or solicitor's employment in the case; provided, that the record of the case shall first be made to show such employment by notice upon the rule docket of such court, by a written memorandum filed with the papers in the case or by notice served upon the defendant in the case.

Acts 1899, ch. 243, § 2; Shan., § 3592a2; mod. Code 1932, § 8036; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-203.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 3 Tenn. Juris., Attorney and Client, §§ 9-18.

Law Reviews.

Attorney vs. Client: Lien Rights and Remedies in Tennessee (Margret H. Tucker), 7 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 435.

Cited: Long v. Crowley, 10 Tenn. App. 156, — S.W.2d —, 1929 Tenn. App. LEXIS 17 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1929); Hail v. Nashville Trust Co., 31 Tenn. App. 39, 212 S.W.2d 51, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 72 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1948).

23-2-104. Power of attorney to execute papers.

An attorney or solicitor has power to execute, in the name of the attorney's or solicitor's client, all bonds or other papers necessary and proper for the prosecution of the suit at any stage of its progress.

Code 1858, § 3978; Shan., § 5790; mod. Code 1932, § 9981; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 29-204.

Cross-References. Fees with reference to cemetery corporations, §§ 46-1-305,46-1-310.

23-2-105. Service of subpoenas.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule of court to the contrary, an attorney licensed to practice law in this state or the attorney's agent shall be authorized to serve subpoenas on witnesses in any civil or criminal case if service is effectuated in accordance with subsection (b) and if the attorney or any member of the attorney's firm is involved in the case for which the subpoenas are issued.

In order for service under this section to be effective, the name of both the attorney and the attorney's agent, if any, shall be written on the subpoena and both persons shall sign the subpoena. The subpoena shall be served in person by either the attorney or the agent whose name appears on the subpoena, and the person effectuating service shall file with the issuing clerk an affidavit of return stating that the subpoena was served, the identity of the person served and the date, place and manner of service. An agent may serve a subpoena under this section only if the agent is eighteen (18) years of age or older. The attorney shall be responsible for the actions of the attorney's agent serving the subpoena in accordance with generally accepted principles of agency law.

Acts 1982, ch. 650, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 711, §§ 1, 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 1.22, 23.13.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 23-2-105.

23-2-106. Tennessee attorney as counsel overseas — Foreign counsel in state.

Any attorney duly licensed to practice law in this state may serve as counsel overseas for the purpose of providing counsel and opinions on Tennessee law.

Any foreign attorney duly licensed to practice law in the attorney's country may serve as counsel in this state for the purpose of providing counsel and opinions on that foreign country's law.

If the foreign counsel wants to appear in court, that attorney must then comply with Tenn. Sup. Ct. R. 19.

Acts 1988, ch. 518, §§ 1, 2.